New Jersey, session 222, S1381.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a.  The Commissioner of Labor and Workforce Development, in consultation with the Department of Health and healthcare stakeholders, shall establish a program and standards to identify and recruit unemployed individuals to work in healthcare facilities1, home care services, and hospice services1.  The identification process shall include: (1)   an evaluation of the practicality of training an individual for a specific position; (2)   the proximity of relevant positions to the individuals residence, and an individuals transportation options to the position; and (3)   what, if any, barriers exist preventing the individual from commencing work immediately for a specific position, even if the position is probationary until the individual completes relevant or required training. b. The commissioner shall, pursuant to the "Administrative Procedure Act," P.L.1968, c.410 (C.52:14B-1 et seq.) promulgate rules and regulations necessary to implement the provisions of this act. 2.    There is appropriated $250,000 from the 1[general fund] General Fund1 for the purpose of funding training programs and providing resources for eligible individuals pursuant to the provisions of this act, in coordination with and utilizing existing training programs administered by the Department of Labor and Workforce Development. 3.  This act shall take effect immediately.